California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(B) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified a book, document, or record or made a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable for the tax.

(2) The taxpayer fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions relative to the offer.

(o) A person who, in connection with an offer or compromise under this section, or offer of that compromise to enter into that agreement, willfully does either of the following shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution:

(1) Conceals from an officer or employee of this state property belonging to
 the estate of a taxpayer or other person liable in respect of the tax.

(2) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies a book, document, or record, or makes a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable in respect of the tax.

(p) For purposes of this section, “person” means the taxpayer, a member of the taxpayer’s family, a corporation, agent, fiduciary, or representative of, or another individual or entity acting on behalf of, the taxpayer, or another corporation or entity owned or controlled by the taxpayer, directly or indirectly, or that owns or controls the taxpayer, directly or indirectly.

(q) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 272, Sec. 17) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 117.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec.118 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 474.)
-------------------------------------------

60637.

(a) The director of the department, or their delegates, may compromise any final tax liability.

(b) For purposes of this section, “a final tax liability” means any final tax liability arising under Part 31 (commencing with Section 60001), or related interest, additions to tax, penalties, or other amounts assessed under this part.

(c) Offers in compromise shall be considered only for liabilities that were generated from a business that has been discontinued or transferred, where the taxpayer making the offer no longer has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business or has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business as the transferred or discontinued
 business.

(d) Offers in compromise shall not be considered where the taxpayer has been convicted of felony tax evasion under this part during the liability period.

(e) For amounts to be compromised under this section, the following conditions shall exist:

(1) The taxpayer shall establish that:

(A) The amount offered in payment is the most that can be expected to be paid or collected from the taxpayer’s present assets or income.

(B) The taxpayer does not have reasonable prospects of acquiring increased income or assets that would enable the taxpayer to satisfy a greater amount of the liability than the amount offered, within a reasonable period of time.

(2) The department shall have determined that acceptance of the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

(f) A determination by the department that it would not be in the best interest of the state to accept an offer in compromise in satisfaction of a final tax liability shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(g) (1) Offers for liabilities with a fraud or evasion penalty shall require a minimum offer of the unpaid tax and fraud or evasion penalty.

(2) The minimum offer may be waived if it can be shown that the taxpayer making the offer was not the person responsible for perpetrating the fraud or evasion. This authorization to waive only applies to partnership accounts where the intent to commit fraud
 or evasion can be clearly attributed to a partner of the taxpayer.

(h) When an offer in compromise is either accepted or rejected, or the terms and conditions of a compromise agreement are fulfilled, the department shall notify the taxpayer in writing. In the event an offer is rejected, the amount posted will either be applied to the liability or refunded, at the discretion of the taxpayer.

(i) When more than one taxpayer is liable for the debt, such as with spouses or partnerships or other business combinations, including, but not limited to, taxpayers who are liable through dual determination or successor’s liability, the acceptance of an offer in compromise from one liable taxpayer shall reduce the amount of the liability of the other taxpayers by the amount of the accepted offer.

(j) Whenever a compromise of tax
 or penalties or total tax and penalties in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved, there shall be placed on file for at least one year in the office of the director of the department a public record with respect to that compromise. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the taxpayer.

(2) The amount of unpaid tax and related penalties, additions to tax, interest, or other amounts involved.

(3) The amount offered.

(4) A summary of the reason why the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secrets, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational
 structure, that if disclosed, would adversely affect the taxpayer or violate the confidentiality provisions of Section 60609. A list shall not be prepared and releases shall not be distributed by the department in connection with these statements.

(k) A compromise made under this section may be rescinded, all compromised liabilities may be reestablished, without regard to any statute of limitations that otherwise may be applicable, and no portion of the amount offered in compromise refunded, if either of the following occurs:

(1) The department determines that any person did any of the following acts regarding the making of the offer:

(A) Concealed from the department property belonging to the estate of a taxpayer or other person liable for the tax.

(B) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified a book, document, or record, or made any false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable for the tax.

(2) The taxpayer fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions relative to the offer.

(l) A person who, in connection with an offer or compromise under this section, or offer of that compromise to enter into that agreement, willfully does either of the following shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution:

(1) Conceals from an officer or employee of this state property belonging
 to the estate of a taxpayer or other person liable in respect of the tax.

(2) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies a book, document, or record, or makes a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable in respect of the tax.

(m) For purposes of this section, “person” means the taxpayer, a member of the taxpayer’s family, a corporation, agent, fiduciary, or representative of, or another individual or entity acting on behalf of, the taxpayer, or another corporation or entity owned or controlled by the taxpayer, directly or indirectly, or that owns or controls the taxpayer, directly or indirectly.

(n) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 272, Sec. 18) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 118.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Distribution of Proceeds [60651. - 60654.]

60651.

The board shall transmit all money received by it under this part, except the amounts of overpayment of the fees required by Section 60185, to the Treasurer to be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account in the Transportation Tax Fund. The board shall at the same time furnish copies of the schedules covering the transmittals to the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60652.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys deposited in the account under this part are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, as follows:

(a) To pay the refunds authorized in this part.

(b) The balance shall be transferred to the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60653.

The Controller shall make the transfers to the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund pursuant to Section 60652 at the same time as the transfers of moneys received under the Motor Vehicle Fuel Tax Law are made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 342, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

60654.

Any costs to the board to carry out any duties imposed upon it by this part shall be paid, upon appropriation by the Legislature, from the moneys deposited in the account under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Violations [60701. - 60709.]

60701.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, association, or corporation, or any officer or agent thereof, through false statement, trick or device, or otherwise, to do any of the following:

(a) Obtain diesel fuel for export and fail to export it, or cause it not to be exported.

(b) Divert diesel fuel, or cause it to be diverted, from interstate or foreign transit begun in this state.

(c) Return diesel fuel to this state and sell or use it, or cause it to be used or sold in this state, without complying with the provisions of this part and without notifying the supplier from whom the diesel fuel was originally purchased of that act.

Any person violating any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 60706.

Each shipment illegally diverted or illegally returned constitutes a separate offense. The unit of each shipment is the cargo of one vessel, one railroad car load, one automobile truck load, one truck and trailer load, one drum, one case, or one can.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60702.

It is unlawful for any supplier or other person to conspire with any person, firm, association, or corporation, or any officer or agent thereof, to withhold diesel fuel from export, or to divert it from interstate or foreign transit begun in this state, or to return it to this state for sale or use so as to avoid any of the taxes imposed by this part.

Each shipment illegally diverted or illegally returned constitutes a separate offense. The unit of each shipment is the cargo of one vessel, one railroad car load, one
 automobile truck load, one truck and trailer load, one drum, one barrel, one case, or one can.

Any person violating any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 60706.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60703.

Any person who acquires diesel fuel outside this state and uses the diesel fuel for the operation of a qualified motor vehicle within and without this state or the United States, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 60706 unless that person is an interstate user who holds a valid diesel fuel tax license or diesel fuel trip permit as defined in Sections 60120 and 60122.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 96.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60704.

Any person who makes, issues or signs a false or fraudulent claim for refund under this part is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 60706.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60705.

(a) Any person required to make, render, sign, or verify any return or report who makes any false or fraudulent return or report with intent to defeat or evade the determination of an amount due required by law to be made is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 60706.

(b) Any person who willfully aids or assists in, or procures, counsels, or advises in the preparation or presentation under, or in connection with any matter arising under this part, of a
 return, affidavit, claim, or other document which is fraudulent or is false as to any material matter, whether or not the falsity or fraud is with knowledge or consent of the person authorized or required to present the return, affidavit, claim, or document is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 60706.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60706.

Any violation of this part, except as otherwise provided, is a misdemeanor. Each offense shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by both fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60706.1.

In addition to the fine or imprisonment, or both, each person convicted under Section 60706 shall pay, in the court’s discretion, up to two dollars ($2) for each gallon of diesel fuel, or portion thereof, knowingly removed, entered, blended, or delivered into a fuel tank, or possessed, kept, stored, or retained for the purpose of removal or removed, or offered for removal, or entry, or entered, or for sale, or actually sold, or offered for sale, or for the purpose of use, or actually used, or for the purpose of delivery into a fuel tank, or actually
 delivered into a fuel tank, or offered for delivery into a fuel tank, in violation of Section 60706, as determined by the court. Proceeds of the assessed penalty shall be distributed to the treasurer of the county in which the action was brought. After reimbursing the prosecuting agency for its costs of prosecution, and after deducting the county’s reasonable costs of administration, the remaining proceeds shall be distributed to the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account in the Transportation Tax Fund. Funds distributed pursuant to this section to the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to pay administrative costs of the board to enforce this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 108.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

60707.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, any person who willfully evades or attempts in any manner to evade or defeat the payment of the tax imposed by this part is guilty of a felony when the amount of tax liability aggregates twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more in any 12-consecutive-month period. Each offense shall be punished by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or imprisonment for 16 months, or two, or three years, or both the fine and imprisonment in the discretion
 of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60707.1.

In addition to the fine or imprisonment, or both, each person convicted under Section 60707 shall pay, in the court’s discretion, up to two dollars ($2) for each gallon of diesel fuel, or portion thereof, knowingly removed, entered, blended, or delivered into a fuel tank, or possessed, kept, stored, or retained for the purpose of removal or removed, or offered for removal, or entry, or entered, or for the purpose of sale, or actually sold, or offered for sale, or for the purpose of use, or actually used, or delivery into a fuel tank, or delivered into a
 fuel tank, or offered for delivery into a fuel tank, in violation of Section 60707, as determined by the court. Proceeds of the assessed penalty shall be distributed to the treasurer of the county in which the action was brought. After reimbursing the prosecuting agency for its costs of prosecution, and after deducting the county’s reasonable costs of administration, the remaining proceeds shall be distributed to the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account in the Transportation Tax Fund. Funds distributed pursuant to this section to the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to pay administrative costs of the board to enforce this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 109.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

60708.

Any prosecution for violation of any of the penal provisions of this part shall be instituted within three years after the commission of the offense, or within two years after the violation is discovered, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60709.

(a) (1) Restitution orders or any other amounts imposed by a court of competent jurisdiction for criminal offenses upon a person or any other entity that are due and payable to the board may be collected by the board in any manner provided by law for collection of a delinquent diesel fuel tax liability, including, but not limited to, issuance of an order and levy under Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of
 Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure in the manner provided for earnings withholding orders for taxes.

(2) Amounts imposed by a court of competent jurisdiction as an order of restitution for criminal offenses shall be treated as final and due and payable to the State of California on the date that amount is established on the records of the board.

(b) Part 31 (commencing with Section 60001) shall apply to amounts collected under this section in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if the language of those laws had been incorporated in full into this section, except to the extent that any provision is either inconsistent with this section or is not relevant to this section.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 60501), a refund or credit shall not be
 allowed for any amounts paid or payments applied under this section.

(d) Amounts authorized to be collected pursuant to this section may accrue interest at the greater of the rate applicable to the amounts being collected or the rate provided under Section 6591.5 from and after the date the amounts are established on the records of the board.

(e) Amounts authorized to be collected pursuant to this section are not subject to any statute of limitations set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60401).

(f) Notwithstanding Sections 60441 to 60445, inclusive, or Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, any portion of the amounts authorized to be collected under this section that remain unsatisfied may be collected by the recording of a notice of state tax lien. The
 board may record or extend a recorded notice of state tax lien at any time until the amount due, including any accrued interest, is paid in full.

(g) This section shall apply on and after January 1, 2012, to amounts authorized to be collected pursuant to this section that are due and payable to the board before, on, or after January 1, 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 727, Sec. 20.   (AB 242)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 32. Individual Shared Responsibility Penalty [61000. - 61050.]

61000.

For the purposes of this part, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Applicable entity” means the following:

(1) A carrier licensed or otherwise authorized to offer health coverage with respect to minimum essential coverage, including coverage in a catastrophic plan, that is not described in paragraph (3) or (4).

(2) An employer or other sponsor of an employment-based health plan with respect to employment-based minimum essential coverage

(3) The State Department of Health Care Services and county welfare departments with respect to coverage under a state program.

(4) The Exchange with respect to individual health plans, except catastrophic plans, on the Exchange.

(5) Any other provider of minimum essential coverage, including the University of California with respect to coverage under a student health insurance program.

(b) “Applicable dependent” has the same meaning as defined in Section 100710 of the Government Code.

(c) “Applicable household income” means, with respect to a
 responsible individual for a taxable year, an amount equal to the sum of the modified adjusted gross income of all applicable household members who were required to file a tax return under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18501) of Part 10.2 for the taxable year.

(d) “Applicable household members” means, with respect to a responsible individual, all of the following persons:

(1) The responsible individual.

(2) The responsible individual’s applicable spouse.

(3) The responsible individual’s applicable dependents.

(e) “Applicable individual” has the same meaning as defined in Section 100710 of the Government Code.

(f) “Applicable spouse” has the same meaning as defined in Section 100710 of the Government Code.

(g) “Dependent” has the same meaning as defined in Section 17056 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(h) “Exchange” means the California Health Benefit Exchange, also known as Covered California, established pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500).

(i) “Household size” means, with respect to a responsible individual, the number of applicable household members.

(j) “Modified adjusted gross income” means adjusted gross income, as defined in Section 17072, increased by both of the following:

(1) The amount of interest received or accrued by the individual during the
 taxable year that is exempt from tax, unless the interest is exempt from tax under the United States Constitution or the California Constitution.

(2) Foreign-earned income, foreign housing exclusion, or foreign housing deduction under Section 911 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(k) “Premium assistance” means the amount of credit allowable under Section 36B of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and any premium assistance subsidies administered pursuant to Title 25 (commencing with Section 100800) of the Government Code.

(l) “Qualified health plan” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1301 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152).

(m) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), “responsible individual” means an applicable individual who is required to file a return under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18501) of Part 10.2 and who is either of the following:

(A) An applicable individual required to be enrolled in and maintain minimum essential coverage, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 100705 of the Government Code.

(B) An applicable individual required to ensure that a person who qualifies as the applicable individual’s applicable spouse or applicable dependent is enrolled in and maintains minimum essential coverage for that month, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 100705 of the Government Code.

(2) If two applicable individuals file a joint
 return, only one shall be considered the responsible individual for purposes of calculating the penalty as determined by the Franchise Tax Board.

(3) If a dependent files a return, only the dependent or the individual claiming the dependent, but not both, shall be considered the responsible individual for purposes of calculating the penalty as determined by the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 42.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

61001.

For the purposes of this part, except as otherwise provided, the determination of whether an individual is an employee shall be governed by Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 2775) of Chapter 2 of Division 3 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 38, Sec. 7.   (AB 2257)   Effective September 4, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

61005.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) The reporting requirement provided for in this section is necessary for the successful implementation of the penalty imposed by Section 61010. In particular, this requirement provides the only widespread source of third-party reporting to help applicable individuals and the Franchise Tax Board verify whether an applicable individual maintains minimum
 essential coverage. There is compelling evidence that third-party reporting is crucial for ensuring compliance with those tax provisions.

(2) The reporting requirement in this section has been narrowly tailored to support compliance with the penalty imposed by Section 61010, while imposing only an incidental burden on reporting entities. In particular, the information required to be reported under this section is limited to the information already required to be reported under a similar federal reporting requirement under Section 6055 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. In addition, this section provides that its reporting requirement may be satisfied by providing the same information that is currently reported under that federal requirement.

(b) For purposes of administering the penalty imposed by this part on applicable individuals who fail to maintain minimum essential
 coverage as required by Title 24 of the Government Code:

(1) An applicable entity that provides minimum essential coverage to an individual during a calendar year shall, at the time the Franchise Tax Board prescribes, make a return to the Franchise Tax Board in the form and manner described in subdivision (c) or (d) on or before March 31 of the year following the calendar year for which the return is required.

(2) An applicable entity described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 61000 shall not be required to make the return specified in paragraph (1) if the applicable entity that is described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 61000 makes that return.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), an applicable entity shall make a return that complies with all of the following:

(1) Is in the form as the Franchise Tax Board prescribes.

(2) Contains the name, address, and taxpayer identification number of the applicable individual and the name and taxpayer identification number of each other individual who receives coverage under the policy.

(3) Contains the dates during which the individuals specified in paragraph (2) were covered under minimum essential coverage during the calendar year.

(4) Contains any other information as the Franchise Tax Board may require.

(d) Notwithstanding the requirements of subdivision (c), a return complies with the requirements of this section if it is in the form of, and includes the information contained in, a return described in
 Section 6055 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as that section is in effect on December 15, 2017.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (g), an applicable entity required to make a return under subdivision (b) shall provide to each primary subscriber, primary policyholder, primary insured, employee, former employee, uniformed services sponsor, parent, or other related person named on an application who enrolls one or more individuals, including themselves, in minimum essential coverage a written statement in the form and manner described in subdivision (f) on or before January 31 of the year following the calendar year for which the return is required under subdivision (b).

(f) The written statement required by subdivision (e) shall include both of the following:

(1) The name and address of the person required to
 make the return and the telephone number of the contact information for that person.

(2) The information required to be shown on the return, as specified in subdivision (c).

(g) Notwithstanding subdivisions (e) and (f), the requirements of this section may be satisfied by a written statement provided to an individual under Section 6055 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as that section is in effect and interpreted on December 15, 2017.

(h) In the case of coverage provided by an applicable entity that is a governmental unit or an agency or instrumentality of that unit, the officer or employee who enters into the agreement to provide the coverage, or the person appropriately designated for purposes of this section, shall be responsible for the returns and statements required by this section.

(i) An applicable entity may contract with third-party service providers, including insurance carriers, to provide the returns and statements required by this section.

(j) Except for the applicable entities described in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 61000, a penalty shall be imposed on an applicable entity that fails to make a return as required by subdivision (b) in an amount of fifty dollars ($50) per applicable individual covered by the applicable entity for a taxable year in which the failure occurs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 42.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

61010.

(a) A penalty in the amount determined under Section 61015 shall be imposed on a responsible individual for a failure by the responsible individual, the applicable spouse, or an applicable dependent to enroll in and maintain minimum essential coverage pursuant to Section 100705 of the Government Code for one or more months, except as provided in Section 61020 and 61023. This penalty shall be referred to as the Individual Shared Responsibility Penalty.

(b) A penalty imposed by this section with respect to any month shall be included with a responsible individual’s return under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18501) of Part 10.2 for the taxable year that includes that month.

(c) If an individual with respect to whom a penalty is imposed by this section for any month is a dependent of another individual for the other individual’s taxable year, including that month, the other individual shall be solely liable for that penalty.

(d) If a responsible individual with respect to whom a penalty is imposed pursuant to this section for any month files a joint return for the taxable year, including that month, that responsible individual and the spouse or domestic partner of the individual shall be jointly and severally liable for the penalty imposed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 42.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

61015.

(a) The amount of the Individual Shared Responsibility Penalty imposed on a responsible individual for a taxable year with respect to the failures described in Section 61010 shall be equal to the lesser of either of the following amounts:

(1) The sum of the monthly penalty amounts determined under subdivision (b) for months in the taxable year during which one or more of the failures described in Section 61010 occurred.

(2) An amount equal to one-twelfth of the state average premium for qualified health plans that have a bronze level of coverage for the applicable household size involved, and are offered through the Exchange for plan years beginning in the calendar year with or within which the taxable
 year ends, multiplied by the number of months in which a failure described in Section 61010 occurred.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), the monthly penalty amount with respect to a responsible individual for any month during which a failure described in Section 61010 occurred is an amount equal to one-twelfth of the greater of either of the following amounts:

(1) An amount equal to the lesser of either of the following:

(A) The sum of the applicable dollar amounts for all applicable household members who failed to enroll in and maintain minimum essential coverage pursuant to Section 100705 of the Government Code during the month, except as provided by Section 61023.

(B) Three hundred percent of the applicable dollar amount determined for the calendar
 year during which the taxable year ends.

(2) An amount equal to 2.5 percent of the excess of the responsible individual’s applicable household income for the taxable year over the amount of gross income that would trigger the responsible individual’s requirement to file a state income tax return under Section 18501, also referred to as the applicable filing threshold, for the taxable year.

(c) For purposes of subdivisions (a) and (b):

(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) and subdivision (d), the applicable dollar amount is six hundred ninety-five dollars ($695).

(2) If an applicable individual has not attained 18 years of age as of the beginning of a month, the applicable dollar amount with respect to that individual for that month shall be equal to
 one-half of the applicable dollar amount as provided in paragraph (1) or subdivision (d).

(3) The maximum monthly penalty, under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a), for a responsible individual with an applicable household size of five or more individuals equals the maximum monthly penalty for a responsible individual with an applicable household size of five individuals.

(d) In the case of a calendar year beginning after 2019, the applicable dollar amount shall be equal to six hundred ninety-five dollars ($695) and increased as follows:

(1) An amount equal to six hundred ninety-five dollars ($695) multiplied by the cost-of-living adjustment determined pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) A cost-of-living adjustment for a calendar year is an amount equal to the percentage by which the California Consumer Price Index for all items in the preceding calendar year exceeds the California Consumer Price Index for all items for the 2016 calendar year.

(3) If the amount of an increase under paragraph (1) is not a multiple of fifty dollars ($50), that increase shall be rounded down to the next multiple of fifty dollars ($50).

(4) No later than August 1 of each year, the Department of Industrial Relations shall annually transmit to the Franchise Tax Board the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index for all items from June of the prior calendar year to June of the current calendar year, inclusive.

(e) For taxable years during
 which the Franchise Tax Board determines that a federal shared responsibility penalty applies, the Individual Shared Responsibility Penalty shall be reduced, but not below zero, by the amount of the federal penalty imposed on the responsible individual for each month of the taxable year during which the Individual Shared Responsibility Penalty is imposed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 8, Sec. 17.   (AB 85)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

61020.

An Individual Shared Responsibility Penalty shall not be imposed on a responsible individual for a month in which any of the following circumstances apply:

(a) If the responsible individual’s required contribution, determined on an annual basis, for coverage for the month exceeds 8.3 percent of that responsible individual’s applicable household income for the taxable year.

(1) For purposes of applying this subdivision, a responsible individual’s applicable household income shall be increased by any exclusion from gross income for any portion of the required contribution made through a salary reduction arrangement for any applicable household member.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the term “required contribution” means either of the following:

(A) In the case of a responsible individual eligible to purchase minimum essential coverage consisting of coverage through an eligible employer-sponsored plan, the portion of the annual premium that would be paid by the responsible individual, without regard to whether paid through salary reduction or otherwise, for self-only coverage.

(B) In the case of a responsible individual eligible only to purchase minimum essential coverage in the individual market, the annual premium for the lowest cost
 bronze plan available in the individual market through the Exchange in the rating area in which the individual resides, reduced by any premium assistance for the taxable year determined as if the responsible individual was covered by a qualified health plan offered through the Exchange for the entire taxable year.

(3) For purposes of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2), if a responsible individual is eligible for minimum essential coverage through an employer by reason of a relationship to an applicable household member, the determination under this subdivision shall be made by reference to the portion of the premium required to be paid by the applicable household member for family coverage.

(4) In the case of plan years beginning in any calendar year after 2019, this subdivision shall be applied by substituting for “8.3 percent” an amount equal to 8 percent increased by the amount the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services determines reflects the excess of the rate of premium growth between the preceding calendar year and 2013 over the rate of income growth for that period. If the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services fails to determine this percentage for a calendar year, the Exchange shall determine the percentage.

(b) If the responsible individual’s applicable household income for the taxable year containing the month
 is less than the amount of adjusted gross income specified in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 18501 for that taxable year.

(c) If the responsible individual’s gross income for the taxable year containing the month is less than the amount specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 18501.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 8, Sec. 18.   (AB 85)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

61023.
